Wyoming, session 2025, HB0117.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 99-3-3001 through 99-3-3004 are
created to read:
ARTICLE 30
2025 CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS
99-3-3001. Definitions.
The definitions in W.S. 99-3-101 apply to this article.
99-3-3002. General authorization.
The provisions of W.S. 99-3-102 apply to this article.
99-3-3003. Level III construction projects – new
development.
(a) Authorization is granted for the Level III new
development construction projects identified in this
section subject to the general conditions specified in W.S.
99-3-103, provided that W.S. 99-3-103(a)(iii) shall not
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
apply to the projects identified in this section unless
required by W.S. 41-2-121.
(b) Project – Big Horn Regional JPB South
Transmission Project 2025:
(i) Project sponsor: Big Horn Regional Joint
Powers Board;
(ii) Project purpose: Municipal and rural
domestic water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
pre-construction of water transmission pipelines,
structures and appurtenances necessary to make the project
function in the manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Eight hundred ten
thousand dollars ($810,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account I
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement and pre-construction engineering
of the project an amount not to exceed four hundred five
thousand dollars ($405,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of
these actual development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriations: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission four hundred
five thousand dollars ($405,000.00) or as much thereof as
is necessary to carry out the purpose of this subsection.
Unexpended funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to water development account I on July 1, 2030;
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vii) Special conditions: The sponsor is
responsible for acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total
project budget from other sources.
(c) Project – Cloud Seeding: Wind River and Sierra
Madre mountain ranges 2026 (ground-based):
(i) Project sponsor: The state of Wyoming;
(ii) Project purpose: To enhance the winter
snowpack in the Wind River and Sierra Madre mountain
ranges;
(iii) Project description: Conduct a
ground-based operational winter snowpack augmentation
program during the 2025-2026 season;
(iv) Total project budget: Eight hundred
sixty-two thousand one hundred forty-three dollars
($862,143.00);
(v) Special conditions: Prior to commencing
project operations, the Wyoming water development office
shall acquire funding commitments from other Colorado River
basin water users or other interested parties for a minimum
of one hundred percent (100%) of actual project operations
costs.
(d) Project – Hoback Junction Public Water System
2025:
(i) Project sponsor: Hoback Junction Water and
Sewer District;
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(ii) Project purpose: Rural domestic water
supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
pre-construction of a diversion structure, pumping
facilities, water transmission pipelines, tank, structures
and appurtenances necessary to make the project function in
the manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Five hundred
forty-eight thousand nine hundred dollars ($548,900.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account I
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement and pre-construction engineering
of the project an amount not to exceed two hundred
seventy-four thousand four hundred fifty dollars
($274,450.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these actual
development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriations: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission two hundred
seventy-four thousand four hundred fifty dollars
($274,450.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to water
development account I on July 1, 2030;
(vii) Special conditions: The sponsor is
responsible for acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total
project budget from other sources.
(e) Project – SAWS JPB Upper Road Transmission Main
Phase I 2025:
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(i) Project sponsor: Sheridan Area Water Supply
Joint Powers Board;
(ii) Project purpose: Municipal and rural
domestic water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of water transmission pipelines, structures
and appurtenances necessary to make the project function in
the manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Four million four
hundred thirteen thousand five hundred dollars
($4,413,500.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account I
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed two
million two hundred six thousand seven hundred fifty
dollars ($2,206,750.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these
actual development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission two million
two hundred six thousand seven hundred fifty dollars
($2,206,750.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to water
development account I on July 1, 2030;
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vii) Special conditions: The sponsor is
responsible for acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total
project budget from other sources.
(f) Project - Small Water Development Projects – New
Development 2025:
(i) Project sponsor: Eligible public entities;
(ii) Project purpose:
Multi-purpose - agriculture, recreation and environmental;
(iii) Project description: Small dams,
windmills, springs, guzzlers and other water collection,
storage and drinking systems, pipelines, etc., to impound,
develop and convey water for livestock, wildlife,
irrigation, environmental and recreational purposes;
(iv) Total project budget: Three million dollars
($3,000,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to sponsors of small water development projects from
water development account I through the commission for the
design, permit procurement, project land procurement,
construction engineering and construction of the project a
total amount not to exceed one million five hundred
thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of
the actual development costs of the small water development
projects, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission one million
five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) or as much
thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
6

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account I on
July 1, 2030;
(vii) Definition: "Small water development
project" means a project where the maximum financial
contribution from the commission is thirty-five thousand
dollars ($35,000.00) or less;
(viii) Special conditions:
(A) The commission may grant a sponsor
fifty percent (50%) of the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction cost of a small project. No grant shall be
more than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000.00);
(B) The small water development project
sponsors shall substantiate the public benefit that will be
derived from proposed small water development projects;
(C) The commission may make monthly
progress payments for no more than fifty percent (50%) of
eligible monthly project expenses;
(D) An appropriate land management or
resource management entity shall certify that the proposed
small water development project will meet expectations and
that appropriate engineering standards, as approved by the
commission, will be adhered to;
(E) The establishment of criteria and
administrative procedures for the development of small
water development projects under this subsection and
decisions of the commission relating to the
7

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
recommendations, prioritization or disqualification of
small water development projects are specifically exempt
from the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure
Act including judicial review under W.S. 16-3-114 and
16-3-115;
(F) W.S. 16-6-116 shall not apply to a
small water development project unless the project sponsor
determines the small water development project meets the
definition of a "public work" as defined in W.S.
16-6-101(a)(ix).
99-3-3004. Level III construction projects –
rehabilitation.
(a) Authorization is granted for the Level III
rehabilitation construction projects identified in this
section subject to the general conditions specified in W.S.
99-3-104, provided that W.S. 99-3-104(a)(iii) shall not
apply to the projects identified in this section unless
required by W.S. 41-2-121.
(b) Project – CAID Lateral 256 Check Structure
Rehabilitation 2025:
(i) Project sponsor: Casper Alcova Irrigation
District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of a check structure and appurtenances
necessary to make the project function in the manner
intended;
8

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iv) Total project budget: Seven hundred
forty-five thousand dollars ($745,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed three
hundred seventy-two thousand five hundred dollars
($372,500.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these actual
development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission three
hundred seventy-two thousand five hundred dollars
($372,500.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to water
development account II on July 1, 2030;
(vii) Special conditions: The sponsor is
responsible for acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total
project budget from other sources.
(c) Project – Casper Tank Replacement 2025:
(i) Project sponsor: City of Casper;
(ii) Project purpose: Municipal water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of water transmission pipelines, tanks,
structures and appurtenances necessary to make the project
function in the manner intended;
9

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iv) Total project budget: Eleven million three
hundred forty-four thousand dollars ($11,344,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed five
million six hundred seventy-two thousand dollars
($5,672,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these actual
development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission five million
six hundred seventy-two thousand dollars ($5,672,000.00) or
as much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of
this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2030;
(vii) Special conditions: The sponsor is
responsible for acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total
project budget from other sources.
(d) Project – Cottonwood Irrigation District Pipeline
Replacement 2025:
(i) Project sponsor: Cottonwood Irrigation
District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of pipelines, structures and appurtenances
10

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
necessary to make the project function in the manner
intended;
(iv) Total project budget: One million one
hundred two thousand dollars ($1,102,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed five
hundred fifty-one thousand dollars ($551,000.00) or fifty
percent (50%) of these actual development costs, whichever
is less;
(vi) Project loan: The state of Wyoming shall
loan to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement
and project land procurement of the project an amount not
to exceed forty-seven thousand dollars ($47,000.00) or
fifty percent (50%) of these actual development costs,
whichever is less, for a term of twenty (20) years from the
date the commission determines that project benefits accrue
to the sponsor, at an annual interest rate of four percent
(4%);
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission five hundred
ninety-eight thousand dollars ($598,000.00) or as much
thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2030;
11

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(viii) Special conditions: The sponsor is
responsible for acquiring forty-five and seventy-four
hundredths percent (45.74%) of the total project budget
from other sources.
(e) Project – EVIDD Farson Lateral Phase 4A 2025:
(i) Project sponsor: Eden Valley Irrigation and
Drainage District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Construction of
pipelines, structures and appurtenances necessary to make
the project function in the manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Four million four
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($4,450,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the permit procurement, project
land procurement and construction of the project an amount
not to exceed one million one hundred twelve thousand five
hundred dollars ($1,112,500.00) or twenty-five percent
(25%) of these actual development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission one million
one hundred twelve thousand five hundred dollars
($1,112,500.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to water
development account II on July 1, 2030;
12

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vii) Special conditions: The sponsor is
responsible for acquiring seventy-five percent (75%) of the
total project budget from other sources.
(f) Project – GID 62.2 Check Structure Project 2025:
(i) Project sponsor: Goshen Irrigation District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of a check structure and appurtenances
necessary to make the project function in the manner
intended;
(iv) Total project budget: One million three
hundred twenty-two thousand dollars ($1,322,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed six
hundred sixty-one thousand dollars ($661,000.00) or fifty
percent (50%) of these actual development costs, whichever
is less;
(vi) Project loan: The state of Wyoming shall
loan to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed six
hundred sixty-one thousand dollars ($661,000.00) or fifty
percent (50%) of these actual development costs, whichever
is less, for a term of twenty (20) years from the date the
13

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
commission determines that project benefits accrue to the
sponsor, at an annual interest rate of four percent (4%);
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission one million
three hundred twenty-two thousand dollars ($1,322,000.00)
or as much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose
of this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under
this subsection shall revert to water development account
II on July 1, 2030.
(g) Project – Kirby Creek Spillway Replacement 2025:
(i) Project sponsor: Kirby Ditch Irrigation
District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of a spillway and appurtenances necessary to
make the project function in the manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Five hundred
fifty-four thousand dollars ($554,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed two
hundred seventy-seven thousand dollars ($277,000.00) or
fifty percent (50%) of these actual development costs,
whichever is less;
14

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vi) Project loan: The state of Wyoming shall
loan to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed two
hundred seventy-seven thousand dollars ($277,000.00) or
fifty percent (50%) of these actual development costs,
whichever is less, for a term of thirty (30) years from the
date the commission determines that project benefits accrue
to the sponsor, at an annual interest rate of four percent
(4%);
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission five hundred
fifty-four thousand dollars ($554,000.00) or as much
thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2030.
(h) Project – Meeteetse Trails Estates 2025:
(i) Project sponsor: Town of Meeteetse;
(ii) Project purpose: Municipal water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of water storage tank and appurtenances
necessary to make the project function in the manner
intended;
(iv) Total project budget: One million one
hundred eighty-one thousand dollars ($1,181,000.00);
15

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed three
hundred twenty-four thousand five hundred eighty-one
dollars ($324,581.00) or twenty-seven and five-tenths
percent (27.5%) of these actual development costs,
whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission three
hundred twenty-four thousand five hundred eighty-one
dollars ($324,581.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to
carry out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to water
development account II on July 1, 2030;
(vii) Special conditions: The sponsor is
responsible for acquiring seventy-two and five‑tenths
percent (72.5%) of the total project budget from other
sources.
(j) Project – Rawlins Sage Creek Pipeline 2025:
(i) Project sponsor: City of Rawlins;
(ii) Project purpose: Municipal water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of blowoffs, air and vacuum stations, inline
valves and appurtenances necessary to make the project
function in the manner intended;
16

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iv) Total project budget: Five million six
hundred seventy thousand dollars ($5,670,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed two
million eight hundred thirty-five thousand dollars
($2,835,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these actual
development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission two million
eight hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($2,835,000.00)
or as much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose
of this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under
this subsection shall revert to water development account
II on July 1, 2030;
(vii) Special conditions: The sponsor is
responsible for acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total
project budget from other sources.
(k) Project – Sidon ID Canal Crossing 2025:
(i) Project sponsor: Sidon Irrigation District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of culverts, structures and appurtenances
necessary to make the project function in the manner
intended;
17

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iv) Total project budget: Eight hundred
ninety-five thousand one hundred ten dollars ($895,110.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the purchase of project
materials as supported by vendor invoices and as approved
by the commission an amount not to exceed four hundred
thirty-two thousand dollars ($432,000.00) or one hundred
percent (100%) of the approved materials costs, whichever
is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission four hundred
thirty-two thousand dollars ($432,000.00) or as much
thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2030;
(vii) Special conditions:
(A) The sponsor is responsible for all
project costs with the exception of the purchase of project
materials as supported by vendor invoices and as approved
by the commission, up to the amount appropriated in this
subsection;
(B) The sponsor is responsible for
retaining professional engineering services to design the
project, compile materials and bidding documents and
monitor construction activities including the installation
of project components and the tracking of project
expenditures.
18

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(m) Project - Small Water Development Projects –
Rehabilitation 2025:
(i) Project sponsor: Eligible public entities;
(ii) Project purpose:
Multi-purpose - agriculture, recreation and environmental;
(iii) Project description: Rehabilitation and
replacement of small dams, windmills, springs, guzzlers and
other water collection, storage and drinking systems,
pipelines, etc., to impound, develop and convey water for
livestock, wildlife, irrigation, environmental and
recreational purposes;
(iv) Total project budget: One million dollars
($1,000,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to sponsors of small water development projects from
water development account II through the commission for the
design, permit procurement, project land procurement,
construction engineering and construction of small water
development projects a total amount not to exceed five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) or fifty percent
(50%) of the actual development costs of the small water
development projects, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purpose of this subsection.
Unexpended funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to water development account II on July 1, 2030;
19

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vii) Definition: "Small water development
project" means a project where the maximum financial
contribution from the commission is thirty-five thousand
dollars ($35,000.00) or less;
(viii) Special conditions:
(A) The commission may grant a sponsor
fifty percent (50%) of the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction cost of a small water development project. No
grant shall be more than thirty-five thousand dollars
($35,000.00);
(B) The small water development project
sponsors shall substantiate the public benefit that will be
derived from proposed small water development projects;
(C) The commission may make monthly
progress payments for not more than fifty percent (50%) of
eligible monthly project expenses;
(D) An appropriate land management or
resource management entity shall certify that the proposed
small water development project will meet expectations and
that appropriate engineering standards, as approved by the
commission, will be adhered to;
(E) The establishment of criteria and
administrative procedures for the development of small
water development projects under this subsection and
decisions of the commission relating to the
recommendations, prioritization or disqualification of
small water development projects are specifically exempt
20

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
from the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure
Act including judicial review under W.S. 16-3-114 and
16-3-115;
(F) W.S. 16-6-116 shall not apply to a
small water development project unless the project sponsor
determines the small water development project meets the
definition of a "public work" as defined in W.S.
16-6-101(a)(ix).
(n) Project – Upper Bluff Pump Plant No. 1 Pipeline
2025:
(i) Project sponsor: Upper Bluff Irrigation
District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of pipelines, structures and appurtenances
necessary to make the project function in the manner
intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Seven hundred
thirteen thousand five hundred dollars ($713,500.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed three
hundred fifty-six thousand seven hundred fifty dollars
($356,750.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these actual
development costs, whichever is less;
21

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission three
hundred fifty-six thousand seven hundred fifty dollars
($356,750.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to water
development account II on July 1, 2030;
(vii) Special conditions: The sponsor is
responsible for acquiring fifty percent (50%) of the total
project budget from other sources.
(o) Project – West Afton ID Phase I Project 2025:
(i) Project sponsor: West Afton Irrigation
District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of pipelines, structures and appurtenances
necessary to make the project function in the manner
intended;
(iv) Total project budget: One million three
hundred seventeen thousand dollars ($1,317,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed six
hundred fifty-eight thousand five hundred dollars
($658,500.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these actual
development costs, whichever is less;
22

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vi) Project loan: The state of Wyoming shall
loan to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed six
hundred fifty-eight thousand five hundred dollars
($658,500.00) or fifty percent (50%) of these actual
development costs, whichever is less, for a term of twenty
(20) years from the date the commission determines that
project benefits accrue to the sponsor, at an annual
interest rate of four percent (4%);
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission one million
three hundred seventeen thousand dollars ($1,317,000.00) or
as much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of
this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2030;
(viii) Special conditions: The appropriation
of funds for this project is contingent upon the transfer
of funds to water development account II as described in
section 4 of this act or transfer from another funding
source.
(p) Project – Willwood ID Willwood Chute 2025:
(i) Project sponsor: Willwood Irrigation
District;
(ii) Project purpose: Agricultural water supply;
23

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of a chute, structures and appurtenances
necessary to make the project function in the manner
intended;
(iv) Total project budget: One million six
hundred ninety-eight thousand dollars ($1,698,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed seven
hundred ninety-eight thousand dollars ($798,000.00) or
forty-seven percent (47%) of these actual development
costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Project loan: The state of Wyoming shall
loan to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed nine
hundred thousand dollars ($900,000.00) or fifty-three
percent (53%) of these actual development costs, whichever
is less, for a term of twenty (20) years from the date the
commission determines that project benefits accrue to the
sponsor, at an annual interest rate of four percent (4%);
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission one million
six hundred ninety-eight thousand dollars ($1,698,000.00)
or as much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose
of this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under
this subsection shall revert to water development account
II on July 1, 2030.
24

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. W.S. 99-3-303(b)(ii), (iii) and (iv) by
creating a new subdivision (F), 99-3-1106(b)(iv), (vi),
(vii) and (viii)(B), 99-3-1503(g)(vi), 99-3-2003(b)(vi),
99-3-2203(b)(iv) through (vi), (vii)(B) and (e)(vi),
99-3-2205(c)(v) and (d)(vii), 99-3-2303(b)(vi),
99-3-2404(e)(iv) through (vii), 99-3-2406(h)(iii) through
(vii) and (vii)(A), 99-3-2503(f)(vi), 99-3-2504(g)(vii) and
(j)(vii), 99-3-2603(d)(iv) through (vi), 99-3-2803(f)(iii)
through (vi) and 99-3-2904(f)(iv) through (vi), (j)(iv)
through (vi) and by creating a new paragraph (vii) are
amended to read:
99-3-303. Level III construction projects new
development.
(b) Project - Aladdin Water Supply Project:
(ii) Project purpose: Municipal, domestic and to
provide and rural domestic water to facilitate highway
construction supply;
(iii) Project description: Authorization for the
commission to sell water from a well constructed from water
development program funds to the Aladdin Water District and
to the Wyoming department of transportation transfer
ownership of the Project;
(iv) Special Conditions:
(F) Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, the commission shall transfer to the Aladdin Water
District all rights, title and interest to the Project, to
25

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
include the well and associated parcel of real property
upon occurrence of all the following:
(I) Expiration of any existing water
service contract between the commission and the Aladdin
Water District;
(II) A finding by the commission that
it has no further Project related interest;
(III) Execution of an agreement
between the commission and Aladdin Water District to
transfer the Project.
99-3-1106. Sponsor's Contingency Funds.
(b) Project – Sponsor's Contingency
Fund-Rehabilitation:
(iv) Total project budget: Five million seven
hundred thousand dollars ($5,700,000.00) Eight million six
hundred thousand dollars ($8,600,000.00);
(vi) Project loan: The state of Wyoming shall
loan to sponsors from water development account II through
the commission sufficient supplemental funds which may be
used to complete construction of projects up to an amount
not to exceed thirty-three percent (33%) fifty percent
(50%) of the difference between the original project budget
and the actual cost of construction, at an annual rate of
four percent (4%);
26

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission five million
seven hundred thousand dollars ($5,700,000.00) eight
million six hundred thousand dollars ($8,600,000.00) or as
much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of
this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2027 2028; and
(viii) Special condition:
(B) The appropriation of additional funds
for this project in the amount of one million two hundred
thousand dollars ($1,200,000.00) two million nine hundred
thousand dollars ($2,900,000.00) is contingent upon the
transfer of funds to water development account II as
described in section 3 of this act or the transfer of funds
from another funding source.
99-3-1503. Level III construction projects ‑ new
development.
(g) Project ‑ Ethete Water Supply:
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission two million
dollars ($2,000,000.00) or as much thereof as is necessary
to carry out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended
funds appropriated under this subsection shall revert to
water development account I on July 1, 2025 2026;
99-3-2003. Level III construction projects ‑ new
development.
27

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(b) Project ‑ Arapahoe Pipeline and Tank:
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission two million
four hundred twenty thousand dollars ($2,420,000.00) or as
much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of
this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account I on
July 1, 2025 2026;
99-3-2203. Level III construction projects – new
development.
(b) Project – Broken Wheel Ranch Water Supply 2017:
(iv) Total project budget: Nine hundred fifteen
thousand dollars ($915,000.00) One million eight hundred
forty-nine thousand four hundred eighty-seven dollars
($1,849,487.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account I
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed six
hundred thirteen thousand fifty dollars ($613,050.00) or
sixty-seven percent (67%) nine hundred thirteen thousand
fifty dollars ($913,050.00) or forty-nine and four‑tenths
percent (49.4%) of the actual development costs, whichever
is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission six hundred
thirteen thousand fifty dollars ($613,050.00) nine hundred
thirteen thousand fifty dollars ($913,050.00) or as much
28

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account I on
July 1, 2025 2026;
(vii) Special conditions:
(B) The sponsor is responsible for
acquiring thirty-three percent (33%) fifty and six‑tenths
percent (50.6%) of the total project budget from other
sources.
(e) Project - Gillette Regional Extensions 2017:
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission two million
seven hundred fifty-three thousand seven hundred dollars
($2,753,700.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to water
development account I on July 1, 2025 2026;
99-3-2205. Level III construction projects – dams and
reservoirs.
(c) Project – Middle Piney Reservoir:
(v) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account III to the commission for project
land procurement, construction engineering and construction
of the project fourteen million two hundred twenty-eight
thousand dollars ($14,228,000.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purpose of this subsection.
Unexpended funds appropriated under this subsection shall
29

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
revert to water development account III on July 1, 2025
2027;
(d) Project – Alkali Creek Reservoir:
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account III to the commission fifty-nine
million dollars ($59,000,000.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purpose of this subsection.
Unexpended funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to water development account III on July 1, 2025
2026.
99-3-2303. Level III construction projects – new
development.
(b) Project - Gillette Regional Extensions Phase IV
2018:
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission one million
five hundred twelve thousand one hundred ninety dollars
($1,512,190.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended funds
appropriated under this subsection shall revert to water
development account I on July 1, 2025 2026;
99-3-2404. Level III construction projects – new
development.
(e) Project GR/RS/SC JPWB Pump Station 2019:
(iv) Total project budget: Eleven million one
hundred ninety thousand dollars ($11,190,000.00) Twenty
30

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
million one hundred twenty thousand dollars
($20,120,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account I
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed seven
million four hundred ninety-seven thousand three hundred
dollars ($7,497,300.00) or sixty-seven percent (67%) eleven
million nine hundred sixty-two thousand three hundred
dollars ($11,962,300.00) or fifty-nine and five‑tenths
percent (59.5%) of the actual development costs, whichever
is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission seven million
four hundred ninety-seven thousand three hundred dollars
($7,497,300.00) eleven million nine hundred sixty-two
thousand three hundred dollars ($11,962,300.00) or as much
thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account I on
July 1, 2026 2028;
(vii) Special conditions: The sponsor is
responsible for acquiring thirty-three percent (33%) forty
and five‑tenths percent (40.5%) of the total project budget
from other sources.
99-3-2406. Level III construction projects –
rehabilitation.
(h) Project – Eden Valley Irrigation District System
Improvements 2019:
31

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iii) Project description: Design and
construction of canal lining, sandtrap structure and
appurtenances necessary to make the project function in the
manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Six hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($650,000.00) One million four hundred
four thousand dollars ($1,404,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed three
hundred fifty-one thousand dollars ($351,000.00) or
fifty-four percent (54%) twenty-five percent (25%) of the
actual development costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission three
hundred fifty-one thousand dollars ($351,000.00) or as much
thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of this
subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2026 2028;
(vii) Special conditions:
(A) The sponsor is responsible for
acquiring forty-six percent (46%) seventy-five percent
(75%) of the total project budget from other sources;
99-3-2503. Level III construction projects new
development.
32

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(f) Project – Gillette Regional Extensions Phase V
2020:
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission three million
eighty-eight thousand seven hundred dollars ($3,088,700.00)
or as much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose
of this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under
this subsection shall revert to water development account I
on July 1, 2025 2027;
99-3-2504. Level III construction projects –
rehabilitation.
(g) Project – Enterprise Watershed Improvement
District Canal Lining 2020:
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission six hundred
ten thousand dollars ($610,000.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purpose of this subsection.
Unexpended funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to water development account II on July 1, 2025
2027.
(j) Project – Laramie Valley Diversion Structure
2020:
(vii) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account II to the commission one million
eight hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,850,000.00) or as
much thereof as is necessary to carry out the purpose of
this subsection. Unexpended funds appropriated under this
33

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
subsection shall revert to water development account II on
July 1, 2025 2027.
99-3-2603. Level III construction projects – new
development.
(d) Project – Lander Well and Transmission Pipeline
2021:
(iv) Total project budget: One million three
hundred twenty thousand dollars ($1,320,000.00) Two million
eight hundred fifty-seven thousand four hundred dollars
($2,857,400.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account I
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement, construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed eight
hundred eighty-four thousand four hundred dollars
($884,400.00) one million nine hundred fourteen thousand
four hundred fifty-eight dollars ($1,914,458.00) or
sixty-seven percent (67%) of the actual development costs,
whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission eight hundred
eighty-four thousand four hundred dollars ($884,400.00) one
million nine hundred fourteen thousand four hundred
fifty-eight dollars ($1,914,458.00) or as much thereof as
is necessary to carry out the purpose of this subsection.
Unexpended funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to water development account I on July 1, 2026 2028;
34

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
99-3-2803. Level III construction projects ‑ new
development.
(f) Project ‑ South End Water Users ISD Pipeline 2023:
(iii) Project description: Design and
pre-construction construction of water transmission
pipelines, structures and appurtenances necessary to make
the project function in the manner intended;
(iv) Total project budget: Four hundred
fifty-nine thousand four hundred three dollars
($459,403.00) Five million five hundred forty-eight
thousand four hundred three dollars ($5,548,403.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account I
through the commission for the design, permit procurement,
project land procurement and pre-construction construction
engineering and construction of the project an amount not
to exceed three hundred seven thousand eight hundred
dollars ($307,800.00) three million seven hundred seventeen
thousand four hundred thirty dollars ($3,717,430.00) or
sixty-seven percent (67%) of these actual development
costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
water development account I to the commission three hundred
seven thousand eight hundred dollars ($307,800.00) three
million seven hundred seventeen thousand four hundred
thirty dollars ($3,717,430.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purpose of this subsection.
Unexpended funds appropriated under this subsection shall
revert to water development account I on July 1, 2028;
35

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
99-3-2904. Level III construction projects ‑
rehabilitation.
(f) Project ‑ Goshen Irrigation District Tunnels 1 and
2 Rehabilitation:
(iv) Total project budget: Eighty-four million
dollars ($84,000,000.00) one hundred four million dollars
($104,000,000.00). The sponsor's project budget is
twenty-one million eight hundred ten thousand dollars
($21,810,000.00) forty-one million eight hundred ten
thousand dollars ($41,810,000.00) or forty-nine percent
(49%) of the total project budget, whichever is less;
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the construction engineering and
construction of the project an amount not to exceed
twenty-one million eight hundred ten thousand dollars
($21,810,000.00) forty-one million eight hundred ten
thousand dollars ($41,810,000.00) or one hundred percent
(100%) of these actual development costs within the
sponsor's project budget, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation:
(A) 2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 74,
Section 1(a)(ii), as amended, appropriated twenty-one
million eight hundred ten thousand dollars ($21,810,000.00)
to the commission to carry out the purpose of this
subsection;.
(B) There is appropriated from the
legislative stabilization reserve account to water
development account II which shall be further appropriated
36

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
from water development account II to the commission twenty
million dollars ($20,000,000.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purpose of this subsection.
Unexpended funds appropriated under this subparagraph shall
revert to the legislative stabilization reserve account on
July 1, 2032.
(j) Project ‑ LaPrele Dam Rehabilitation:
(iv) Total project budget: One hundred eighteen
million dollars ($118,000,000.00) One hundred eighty-two
million dollars ($182,000,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design and construction of
the project an amount not to exceed thirty million dollars
($30,000,000.00) ninety million dollars ($90,000,000.00) or
one hundred percent (100%) of these actual development
costs, whichever is less;
(vi) Appropriation:
(A) 2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 74,
Section 1(a)(iii), as amended, appropriated thirty million
dollars ($30,000,000.00) to the commission to carry out the
purpose of this subsection;.
(B) There is appropriated from the
legislative stabilization reserve account to water
development account II which shall be further appropriated
from water development account II to the commission sixty
million dollars ($60,000,000.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purpose of this subsection.
37

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Unexpended funds appropriated under this subparagraph shall
revert to water development account III on July 1, 2032.
(vii) Special conditions: Available federal
funds shall be expended prior to the expenditure of funds
appropriated under paragraph (vi) of this subsection.
Section 3. W.S. 99-3-303(b)(iv)(A) through (E) and
99-3-2903(f) are repealed.
Section 4.
(a) The Wyoming water development commission is
hereby authorized to transfer four million two hundred
thousand dollars ($4,200,000.00) from water development
account I created by W.S. 41-2-124(a)(i) to water
development account II created by W.S. 41-2-124(a)(ii).
(b) In accordance with W.S. 41-2-115(b), upon a
finding that the transfer of test wells, Belvoir No. 5 and
Belvoir No. 6, developed as part of the level II
feasibility study authorized under 2004 Wyoming Session
Laws, Chapter 34, Section 4, to the Cheyenne Board of
Public Utilities (BOPU) is desirable and in the public
interest and that BOPU is capable of constructing,
operating and maintaining the project and accomplishing the
public interest, the water development commission shall
transfer to BOPU test wells, Belvoir No. 5 and Belvoir No.
6, developed as part of a level II feasibility study for
further development by BOPU, provided agrees to terms
outlined by the commission for reimbursement of the expense
of predevelopment costs, an amount which shall be not less
than two hundred eighteen thousand dollars ($218,000.00),
payment for property and assurances of construction,
operation and maintenance of the test wells, Belvoir No. 5
38

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
and Belvoir No. 6 in compliance with all applicable state
and federal laws.
Section 5.
(a) The state engineer's office is authorized up to
one (1) full-time position in the board of control division
for the period beginning with the effective date of this
act and ending June 30, 2026 for a natural resources
program supervisor. It is the intent of the legislature
that the state engineer's office include this full-time
position in its standard budget request for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.
(b) There is appropriated one hundred fifty-six
thousand three hundred twenty dollars ($156,320.00) from
the general fund to the state engineer's office for the
period beginning with the effective date of this act and
ending June 30, 2026 to be expended only for purposes of
funding the position authorized in subsection (a) of this
section. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert as provided by law on June 30, 2026.
(c) This section shall not be effective if 2025 House
Bill 0001 or 2025 Senate File 0001 is enacted into law and
authorizes the position authorized in subsection (a) of
this section.
Section 6.
(a) There is appropriated one hundred forty-eight
thousand dollars ($148,000.00) from the general fund to the
state engineer's office for updating the technology used
39

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
for the accounting system that calculates the natural flow
of the North Platte River. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2026.
(b) If 2025 Senate File 0001 or 2025 House Bill 0001
is enacted into law, the appropriation in subsection (a) of
this section shall be reduced by one dollar ($1.00) for
every one dollar ($1.00) appropriated to the state
engineer's office for updating the technology used for the
accounting system that calculates the natural flow of the
North Platte River in 2025 Senate File 0001 or 2025 House
Bill 0001.
Section 7. The office of state lands and investments
shall investigate opportunities to, and subject to the
approval of the board of land commissioners shall, exchange
public lands for private lands around the LaPrele dam and
reservoir to increase public access to, and recreational
activity in, the area.
40

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0117
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 8. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
41